Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Chapter 31. Drainage Districts with County Commissioners
§ 51-31-57.
Notice of appraisement by commissioners.

When the commissioners shall have made their appraisement of the land taken or to be taken, they shall certify the same and file it with the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which the land lies, and if the proceedings be in another county, also with said clerk in the county where the proceedings are had. The clerk shall thereupon set down and fix a time for the hearing of objections to such appraisement, at the request of the commissioners, to be heard by the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation. The clerk shall issue a summons directed to the sheriff of the county or counties of this state in which any landowner or other person interested may reside, commanding him to summon such owner or owners or other interested person to be and appear at the time and place named. If the owner of any land sought to be taken be an infant or person of unsound mind, the summons may be executed on his guardian; and the guardian in such cases is authorized, subject to the approval of the chancellor in term time or vacation, to sell and convey such property and dedicate it thus to the public use, or he may agree upon the damages and thereby bind the ward. If there be no guardian in such case, the chancellor in vacation may, on application of any one in interest, appoint a guardian ad litem to represent such infant or person of unsound mind, whose acts and doings in the premises shall be valid and binding on the ward. The chancellor may require a bond of such guardian ad litem. If the owner of such land be a nonresident of the state or cannot be found, or if the owner be unknown, and this shall apply to any person interested, upon affidavit to that fact being made by the commissioners or by their agent or attorney, service of the summons may be had on any of his agents in charge of the land; or publication shall be made in the manner provided by law for publication for nonresident and unknown parties in chancery suits. If the land belong to a deceased person whose estate is being administered, the summons may be served on the executor or administrator, who shall, for all purposes of this chapter, be authorized to act for the owner, and he shall be responsible on his bond accordingly. Such notice, when published, need only state that the hearing will be for the purpose of confirming the report of the commissioners as to the appraisement of land taken for the use of the district and through which the ditches of the district are to run; it shall contain the names of the owners or persons interested in such land and their post-office address, if known, and if unknown that fact shall be so stated; and it shall further contain a list of the land, described by section numbers, belonging to such nonresident owners and through which the ditches of the district are to run. If any owner is not satisfied with the amount allowed by the commissioners for land taken by reason of the construction of such proposed system according to the plans of said district, he shall file written objections thereto on or before the day named in the summons or notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4280; 1930, § 4389; 1942, § 4594; Laws, 1914, ch. 270.

§ 51-31-59.
Appraisement hearing.

If on the hearing by the court or chancellor in vacation no written objections are filed, a decree confirming the appraisement shall be rendered. Upon payment of said amount to the chancery clerk for the party entitled thereto, the district may enter upon and take possession of said property and appropriate it to the use of said district; and the title to the easement thereof and thereover shall thereupon vest in said district. The clerk shall receipt upon said decree for the money paid, and said decree with the receipt of the clerk thereon shall be recorded in the records of deeds of the county in which the land lies. If written objections are filed on or before the time set for the hearing, the court or chancellor in vacation shall proceed to hear the objections filed and, on demand of the party making said objections, shall empanel a jury to determine the value of the land taken and the damage due the objector.

No decree pro confesso shall be entered against an owner or person interested residing in this state unless it appear that he has been duly served with summons at least two days prior to the return-day, and no decree pro confesso shall be rendered against any nonresident or unknown owner or person interested unless proper publication has been made.

At the hearing, the report and appraisement of the value of the land sought to be taken and the damages sustained by the owner thereof shall be prima facie correct.

The court or chancellor in vacation may, at such hearing, hear all objections in entirety or in severalty, may enter a decree confirming the entire report of the commissioners, or may enter any number of decrees confirming the report as to any land taken. At such hearing, the court or chancellor in vacation may direct the board to make such alterations in the appraisement as may be deemed just and equitable, by raising or lowering any appraisement; and payment of such amount fixed by the decree shall be made to the chancery clerk as hereinbefore provided. Said clerk shall receipt for same on the decree, and such decree with receipt thereon shall be recorded.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4281; 1930, § 4390; 1942, § 4595; Laws, 1914, ch. 270.

§ 51-31-61.
Levy to provide estimated funds.

Upon the organization of said districts as herein provided, and as soon as said drainage commissioners have proceeded to procure the rights-of-way, either by agreement or condemnation, for ditches or canals, both main and lateral, or for the erection of levees, and the right-of-way to enter upon, alter, deepen, or improve natural drains or watercourses, they shall make an estimate of the cost, including commissioner’s fees and expenses of said proposed work, or if said estimate has been made it shall be revised and approved. Said commissioners shall file a levy certifying the amount required by them for the construction of such proposed work, and may in said levy order that so much of the benefits or betterments assessed against the lands in such district as will be necessary to defray the costs of said work, to be paid in cash; or said commissioners may in said levy order that the same be paid in not exceeding forty (40) installments, with interest on each installment at a rate of interest not to exceed six percent (6%) per annum. Or, the said commissioners may order in said levy that bonds of said district shall be issued and sold for any amount not exceeding eighty percent (80%) of the assessed value of the benefits or betterments. Said bonds shall be payable in from one (1) to forty (40) years from the date issued, with interest from the date issued at an overall maximum interest rate to maturity not greater than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, payable annually or semiannually, as the court or chancellor in vacation may direct; and it shall be lawful to attach coupons for any part of a year to the bonds maturing the first year. If bonds are thus issued and sold for an amount not exceeding eighty percent (80%) of the value of said betterments, the said commissioners may order the remaining twenty percent (20%), or any part thereof, to be paid in cash at its discretion. If the amounts levied be not sufficient to complete the work done or hereafter to be done, or if bonds are issued and sold for an amount less than eighty percent (80%) of the value of the assessed benefits and additional funds are required to complete the work or pay for work theretofore done, an additional levy may be made or an additional issue of bonds may be made, provided the additional levy, when added to the original levy, shall not exceed the amount of betterments assessed, or that the additional bond issue shall not be for an amount which, added to the original bond issue, shall exceed eighty percent (80%) of the assessed value of the betterment. Such additional levy shall be made payable in cash or in not exceeding fifteen (15) installments, each installment bearing interest at a rate not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the registered bond act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1706; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4294; 1930, § 4396; 1942, § 4601; Laws, 1924, ch. 258; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1984).

§ 51-31-63.
Tax levied to meet assessment.

On or before the first Monday of September of each year, the drainage commissioners shall levy a tax on the amount of the original or supplemental assessment of benefits, which shall be in the same proportion as the installment authorized and directed by the court to become due that year, and shall certify their levy to the board of supervisors of the county in which the land lies. It shall thereupon become and be the duty of the said board or boards of supervisors to make a levy in accordance with such assessment sufficient to meet the bond obligations issued by the drainage commissioners and the interest accruing thereon, with ten per cent of the amount of such annual payment added for contingent expenses and liabilities in accordance with the decree of the chancellor. The ten per cent additional levy herein provided may be omitted in any one year when it shall appear that the contingent expense fund on hand exceeds twenty per cent of the total amount of bond and interest obligations falling due during the fiscal year. The said levy shall be apportioned and levied on each tract of land or other property in the district in proportion to the benefits assessed, and not in excess thereof. As soon as said levy is made, the secretary of the commissioners, at the expense of the district, shall prepare an assessment record of the district. It shall be a copy of the “assessment roll” provided above, and may contain any number of columns therein in which may be inscribed the levy made each year. He shall place therein the amount of the levy for the year, including interest accruing on the unpaid installments, and the said record shall be certified by the board of drainage commissioners, attested by the seal of the district, and filed with the tax collector of the county in which the land is located. The said secretary shall make a copy for each county in which the lands of the district may be situated, but only the lands situated in such county need be inscribed therein. At the time of confirming such assessment as herein provided, it shall be competent for the court or chancellor in vacation in such order to provide for all details connected with the fixing of the date, form, maturity, and amounts of any and all bonds that are ordered to be issued, and the fixing of the installments for the payment of such bonds. The court or chancellor in vacation may take the matter of such details under advisement for such further orders and decrees in vacation as may be necessary or advisable to perfect the details of same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4288; 1930, § 4397; 1942, § 4602; Laws, 1914, ch. 270.

§ 51-31-65.
Levy each year to meet bond obligations.

It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors of each county in which land is located, on the recommendation of the drainage commissioners, to make a levy each year on the lands lying in their respective counties in accordance with such assessments and levies sufficient to meet bond obligations of any district issued by authority of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4289; 1930, § 4398; 1942, § 4603; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-67.
Reassessments in case of underestimates.

If the court, chancellor, or drainage commissioners have underestimated the amount or the costs of work necessary for any district, then on the recommendation of the commissioners, the court or chancellor may order such additional work done or such additional costs paid and may, with the approval of the commissioners and on their recommendation, reassess the several properties of the district in proportion to the benefits to accrue to such respective properties. In such case the commissioners shall report the facts as they are required to report the benefits and assessments in the first instance, and the court or chancellor shall hear their report and all objections thereto on the same notice to the parties interested as in the first instance of approving assessments and benefits. Appeal shall lie from decree as in the first instance, and they shall be final only as decrees are final in the first instance.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4290; 1930, § 4399; 1942, § 4604; Laws, 1912, ch. 199.

§ 51-31-69.
Sale of district bonds.

In case the drainage district shall issue bonds for any part of the money levied for the purpose of the district as hereinabove authorized, said bonds may be sold upon the market to the best advantage but shall not be sold for less than par value, unless a sale below par be approved by the chancellor and the commissioners. The whole amount realized from the sale of such bonds shall be deposited in the treasury of said district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1709; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4297; 1930, § 4402; 1942, § 4607; Laws, 1914, ch. 273.

§ 51-31-71.
Contracts let to lowest bidder.

After the organization of any drainage district under this chapter, and after the confirmation of the assessment as in this chapter provided, and after laying out a system of main drains for said drainage district, the said commissioners shall advertise for bids for the construction of said ditches by publishing a notice for three weeks in some newspaper in the county in which such district is organized, stating the time when and place where they will receive bids for the construction of such work. The time fixed for receiving and opening said bids shall not be less than twenty-two days from the time of the first publication. Said notice shall specify the kind and nature of the work to be done, the amount thereof as estimated by the engineer, and in what manner payment thereof will be made. They shall meet at the time and place designated in said notice and open said bids, and said contracts shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The said commissioners shall have the right to reject any and all bids if they deem that the same are too high, and may adjourn said letting to a future time and continue said advertisement until that time.

The commissioners shall take and file a certificate of publication of such notice with the clerk; and upon the acceptance of any bid for the construction of any work, they shall require said bidder to enter into contract with them for the faithful performance of said work according to the plans, specifications, profile, and estimates of the engineer, and require said contractor to enter into bonds for the faithful performance of said work within the time and in the manner specified in said contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1710; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4299; 1930, § 4403; 1942, § 4608.

§ 51-31-73.
Commissioners to construct and maintain drains.

The commissioners may, after the organization of said district, do any and all acts that may be necessary in and about the surveying, laying out, constructing, repairing, altering, enlarging, cleaning, protecting, and maintaining any drain or ditch or other work for which they have been appointed. They and their successors shall have charge of said ditch in perpetuity, and shall annually see that the same is cleaned out and all obstructions, brush, willow, or other growth removed therefrom, to the end that said ditches shall be kept thoroughly cleaned and in good repair so as to perfectly drain said lands. For those purposes, the commissioners may borrow money in anticipation of the collection of already levied taxes not to exceed in any one (1) fiscal year one percent (1%) of the amount of the benefits assessed against all of the real property in the district, at an overall maximum interest rate to maturity not greater than that allowed in Section 75-17-105. They may issue in evidence thereof tax anticipation warrants, which warrants shall be paid solely and only out of the first funds collected from taxes levied prior to the borrowing of such funds and issuance of such warrants; and they may make additional assessments from time to time, as necessity may require, to pay for the expense of maintaining, cleaning out, and keeping in repair the ditches of said district and meeting the legal obligations of such district. The additional assessment for maintaining, cleaning out, and keeping in repair the ditches of said district and meeting the legal obligations of such district shall be made by the commissioners in the following manner: on or before the first Monday in September of each year the drainage commissioners shall assess on each tract of land or other property in the district, in proportion to the original and supplemental benefits assessed for construction, such an amount as is necessary to pay the expense of maintaining, cleaning out, and keeping in repair the ditches of said district and meeting the legal obligations of such district, and shall certify their assessment to the board of supervisors of the county in which the land lies; and it shall thereupon become and be the duty of the board of supervisors to levy a tax in accordance with such assessment sufficient to meet said expense of maintaining, clearing out, and keeping in repair the ditches of said district. The said tax levied shall be apportioned to and levied on each tract of land or other property in said district in proportion to the original and supplemental benefits assessed for construction, or as otherwise provided by law. As soon as the said tax levy is made, the secretary of the commission, at the expense of the district, shall prepare an assessment record of the district, which may contain any number of columns therein, in which may be inscribed the tax levied each year. He shall place therein the amount of the levy for the year, and the said record shall be certified by the commissioners, attested by the seal of the district, and filed with the tax collector of the county in which the land is located. The said secretary shall make a copy for each county in which any lands of the district may be situated, but only the lands situated in the county need be inscribed therein. Any person aggrieved at the action of the board of supervisors in levying the tax herein provided shall have the same right of appeal as is provided by law for appealing from the action of said board in levying county taxes. All taxes hereunder assessed and levied shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as are state and county taxes, and the same penalties shall accrue for the nonpayment thereof as for nonpayment of state and county taxes. In the event a drainage ditch shall be totally destroyed by the construction of public levees, the drainage district commissioners shall strike the land affected by such destruction from the assessment rolls of the district; but such action shall in no way affect the lien of the bondholders of the district upon such land.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1712; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4301; 1930, § 4404; 1942, § 4609; Laws, 1920, ch. 285; Laws, 1940, ch. 222; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 7; Laws, 1995, ch. 392, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1995).

§ 51-31-75.
Lateral ditches to be laid out.

After the construction of said system of main ditches for said drainage district, all landowners in said district may construct branch or lateral drains, either open or tile, leading into said ditches and thereby drain their respective lands into said main outlet. In case any two or more landowners desiring to construct a branch or lateral ditch or drain to drain their lands cannot agree upon the just proportion to be borne by each, any one of them may petition the commissioners to lay out a branch ditch leading to and draining their lands; and the commissioners may proceed to lay out the same by giving notice and making assessments on the land in said subdistrict in the same manner in which they are herein required to give for the organization of the main district and assessment of the property benefited thereby.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1713; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4302; 1930, § 4405; 1942, § 4610.

§ 51-31-77.
Actual damages recoverable.

In case any damages shall be allowed to any landowner for the construction of ditches across his said lands, actual damages shall be allowed. Such damages shall be paid in cash by giving to the party entitled thereto an order for the amount thereof on said district treasurer, who shall pay the same on presentation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1714; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4303; 1930, § 4406; 1942, § 4611.

§ 51-31-79.
Jurisdiction of drainage commissioners.

Where the lands of any drainage district lie in two or more counties of this state, the county drainage commissioners of the county in which the greatest or greater number of acres of land lies, and in which the suit is brought for the organization of the drainage district, shall have jurisdiction as county drainage commissioners under the chancellor or chancery court of the entire drainage district the same as if the entire drainage district lay in the county of their selection. In reporting to the board of supervisors levies of taxes to be made by the board for the payment of bonds and other obligations of the district, the county drainage commissioners having jurisdiction over such drainage district shall make report to the board of supervisors of each county in which any of the lands of the drainage district lie, showing all the lands and assessments thereon lying in such county. The board of supervisors of the county in which such lands lie shall make the required levies, and the tax collectors of the counties in which the lands lie shall collect the taxes thus levied and account to the treasurer of the drainage district therefor, as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4382; 1930, § 4407; 1942, § 4612; Laws, 1912, ch. 197.

§ 51-31-81.
Annual reports.

At the end of the fiscal year after the organization of said drainage district and annually thereafter, the said commissioners shall make a report showing the amount of money levied for main district purposes, the amount of orders issued, the purposes for which issued, to whom payable, the amount of money on hand, and the amounts levied and expended for each and every subdistrict or lateral drain laid out and established by them. If at any time it shall appear that there is not sufficient funds to pay for any work done or contemplated, the commissioners may make a levy for the amount required to finish paying for the work already done or to perform the contemplated work; if any landowner shall feel aggrieved at any such assessments, he may have the right to appear in said court and file his objections to such additional levies for repairs and improvements, and the court shall hear and determine the same as justice and equity shall require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1715; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4304; 1930, § 4408; 1942, § 4613.

§ 51-31-83.
Commissioners may go on lands.

The commissioners, from the time such petitions to organize a district are referred to them by the court or chancellor in vacation, shall have the right and authority to go upon any and all of the lands lying within said district for the purpose of examining the same and making plans, surveys, profiles, and estimates of the kind, character, and cost of said proposed system of drains, and may go upon said lands at any time for the purpose of removing obstructions, cleaning out, and keeping in repair the said ditches. No landowner shall have any power or authority to prevent, hinder, or delay the commissioners in the discharge of their lawful duties in that behalf; and in case such landowner or any other person shall undertake to interfere with, hinder, obstruct, or delay the commissioners in the discharge of their duties, the said commissioners or either of them may file his or their complaint in the chancery court or before the chancellor in vacation. Thereupon said court or chancellor shall cite said party to appear and show cause, if any he has, why he should not be fined for said hindrance or obstruction, and the court or chancellor may fine such party not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day for every day’s hindrance caused by him to said commissioners, as for a contempt of the chancery court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1717; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4306; 1930, § 4410; 1942, § 4615.

§ 51-31-85.
Ditches already constructed may be used.

In laying out such proposed work and drains and ditches, the commissioners shall have the right to take and use any ditches heretofore constructed in any part of said district by any landowner owning the same. If any such ditches existing prior to the organization of such district shall be of any value to the said district, the said commissioners shall have the power to allow the said landowner reasonable compensation for the value thereof, which shall be put down on the assessment roll as a credit for ditches already constructed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1718; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4307; 1930, § 4411; 1942, § 4616.

§ 51-31-87.
Compensation for use of other district drains.

After the organization of any drainage district under this chapter or after the filing of a petition to organize any such district, if any other or different drainage district lying adjacent to or above said proposed drainage district, or any district not heretofore organized shall be organized and drain the water from their ditches into the ditches or drains of the said lower drainage district from the lands lying above or adjacent and draining into the said drainage district so organized or petitioned for, the commissioners of such lower district shall ask, demand, and receive from said upper district or adjacent district just compensation for an outlet for the waters of said upper or adjacent district. In case said commissioners of the two districts cannot agree upon the amount to be paid by such district, then the same shall be submitted by petition to the chancery court or chancellor in vacation having jurisdiction of the lower district. Said court or chancellor shall hear the petition on proper notice and shall apportion the cost or amount to be paid, if any, by such upper or adjacent district. This section shall apply to all natural drains which may have been heretofore or which shall hereafter be improved, cleaned out, dredged, and used as a drainage canal or main outlet for any drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1720; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4309; 1930, § 4413; 1942, § 4618; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-89.
Passing railroads with canal.

If in the organization of any drainage district and thereafter in the construction of ditches, drains, or other improvements, it shall be necessary to cross under or through any railroad or the right of way thereof, the same may be accomplished in the following manner: Upon filing of the report of the commissioners as to assessments and benefits and damages, they shall make a special report showing the proposed plans, manner, and character of the work as proposed in passing through such right of way, together with an estimate of the costs of same, including all damages that will be sustained by the railroad by virtue of the construction of the proposed work; and upon the hearing of such commissioner’s report, it shall be the duty of said railroad company to appear and show cause why said report should not be confirmed, as other parties interested are required to appear and on the same notice. In such showing it shall be the duty of the railroad company to file with the court, on or before the time set for the hearing, its estimate of the costs of the proposed work, including all damage that will be sustained by it by doing the proposed work. The court or chancellor in vacation shall determine the amount of such costs and damages to the railroad, and said finding shall be final and conclusive adjudication of such matters, unless appealed from in the manner provided for appeals under this chapter. The prosecution of an appeal shall not prevent the drainage commissioners constructing the work as proposed through the railroad right of way, whenever in their discretion it is necessary to do said work. Before beginning the construction of such work through such right of way, the drainage commissioners shall pay to the railroad company, or the chancery clerk for it, the amount of damages adjudicated against the district in the decree appealed from.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1721; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4310; 1930, § 4414; 1942, § 4619; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-91.
Notice and damages.

When it shall become necessary, in the course of the construction of the work being done by the drainage commissioners, to pass through said right of way in the manner and according to plans theretofore filed as above provided, it shall be the duty of the drainage commissioners to give notice in writing to said railroad company of its desire to cross said right of way with its construction work on some approximate date, which shall not be less than sixty days from the date of such notice. Said notice shall be served upon any agent or employee of said railroad company upon whom, under the laws of the state, service of process may be had; and the commissioners shall at the same time pay or tender to said railroad company such costs and damages as may have been adjudged against the drainage district, as hereinbefore provided. It shall thereupon be the duty of the railroad company within a reasonable time to complete such construction work across its right of way, according to the aforesaid plans and specifications under the supervision of the engineer employed by said drainage commissioners, or to permit same to be done by the drainage commissioners. Should the railroad company fail, neglect, or refuse to do and perform in good faith said work within the time fixed by said drainage commissioners for the performance thereof, or to permit same to be done, it shall be liable to the drainage district and all persons for any damage it or they may sustain by reason of such failure, and said railroad company may be compelled to perform such work by mandatory injunction issued at the instance of the drainage commissioners. This section shall not be so construed as to prohibit the drainage commissioners from acquiring such right of way by the regular eminent domain proceeding if they so elect, or as otherwise provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4311; 1930, § 4415; 1942, § 4620; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-93.
Railroad may be assessed for benefits.

If, in the organization of any drainage district under this chapter, it shall appear that any railroad company will be benefited by the construction of the proposed work, the drainage commissioners shall have the right to assess the said railroad such amount as they may deem said railroad or railroad company benefited. Said assessment shall be made at the time of assessing the lands of said district, and said railroads shall have the right to appear and make objections as land owners in said district at the time of hearing objections to such assessments.

In determining the amount of such benefits, the court or chancellor in vacation may take into consideration the improvements that might be made by said railroad of a permanent character, and the increased revenue to be gained by the improvement of the lands in said district for agriculture and sanitation, if any can be shown by the construction of such proposed work.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4312; 1930, § 4416; 1942, § 4621; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-95.
Drain may cross public road.

If in the construction of such ditches the same shall cross any public road, it shall be the duty of the drainage commissioners to notify the board of supervisors of such county in which such public road is located, at some regular meeting of said board held prior to a day which is thirty days next before the time fixed in such notice for the time at which the proposed work shall be constructed across said public road, stating in such notice the width and depth of such proposed work. It shall be the duty of the board of supervisors to cause to be removed and constructed, at the expense of the county, all bridges necessary to be removed or constructed, same to be done at such time as is reasonable, with a view to the convenience of the public and without unreasonable delay to the prosecution of such work.

Contracts may be made by the board of supervisors for such removal and construction of such bridge or bridges, without first advertising for bids where the cost of any one bridge does not exceed one hundred dollars.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1722; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4313; 1930, § 4417; 1942, § 4622; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-97.
Landowners outside of district may use drains.

If the owner or owners of any lands lying outside of a drainage district have made or shall hereafter make connection with the main ditch or drain or with any branch or lateral ditch or drain within the district, or if any such land is drained into the ditches and drains of a drainage district by ditches or drains constructed either before or after the organization of such drainage district, and if in either case the lands outside of such drainage district are benefited by the work done in such drainage district, the owner or owners shall be deemed to have made voluntary application to be included in such drainage district. Thereupon, the commissioners shall make a complaint in writing, stating the description of such land or lands benefited, the amount of benefits, the name of the owner or owners thereof, and the description of the drain or ditch making connection with the ditches as near as may be, and file said complaint in the chancery court where said district was organized. Said court or chancellor in vacation shall fix a day, not less than twenty-five days from the filing of the petition, when it shall hear such complaint; and thereupon the clerk of said court shall give each of the landowners notice of said proceedings by mailing each of them notice of said complaint to their post-office addresses not less than ten days prior to the date for said hearing, or personal service may be served on each of them as provided in ordinary suits not less than five days prior to the date of the hearing. On the hearing of the complaint and the issues joined, if any, if the court or chancellor finds the allegations in the complaint true, it shall decree that such lands, or such parts thereof as are benefited, be joined to said district petitioning. Such lands shall thereafter be a part of said petitioning district lands and shall be assessed and dealt with accordingly. Benefits, damages, and assessments may thereafter be made against such added lands on the same notice and under the same proceedings as against lands in the district originally, and said added lands shall be made to appear on the assessment rolls of the district as other lands of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1723; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4314; 1930, § 4418; 1942, § 4623; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-99.
Reassessment if estimate deficient.

If, after the first assessment of benefits, which it is estimated will result from the proposed drainage scheme, has been made it develops that on account of additional work done or to be done the benefits to the whole or any part of the district is or will be greater than was originally assessed, the commissioners may proceed to reassess and apportion the benefits so as to correct the same to conform to the benefits to be received. However, the aggregate value of benefits so assessed shall in no event be less than the original assessment. Such additional assessment shall be made in the same manner, under the same requirements, and upon the same notice as is provided for making the original assessment.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4315; 1930, § 4419; 1942, § 4624; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-101.
Penalty for injuring drains.

Any person who shall wrongfully or purposely fill up, cut, injure, destroy, or in any manner injure or impair the usefulness of any drain, ditch, or other work constructed under drainage laws shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, may be fined in any sum not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100.00), and shall be liable for double the expense occasioned by repairing the same or removing such obstruction, to be recovered at the suit of the proper drainage district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 1724; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4316; 1930, § 4420; 1942, § 4625.

§ 51-31-103.
Benefit to county farm.

Where a county farm owned by any county lies within any drainage district and would be benefited thereby, the board of supervisors are authorized in their discretion to pay out of the general county fund the pro rata of tax for which such county lands should be taxed if owned by individuals.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4319; 1930, § 4422; 1942, § 4627.

§ 51-31-105.
Jurisdiction of suits.

The proper chancery court of the county of the defendant district being sued shall have jurisdiction of all suits brought against such district, and between drainage districts suing unless otherwise provided. The chancery court organizing a drainage district shall have exclusive jurisdiction of all suits brought against such district, unless otherwise herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4325; 1930, § 4424; 1942, § 4629; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.

§ 51-31-107.
Master may hear and determine causes; report of findings to chancellor.

The chancellor shall have the power to appoint a master as provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure to hear and determine any and all matters which, under the provisions of this chapter or any act amendatory thereof, it is the duty of the chancellor to hear and determine. The master shall report his findings to the chancellor for confirmation, such findings to be subject to exceptions in the same manner as other reports of masters are now subject to exceptions, and such masters may continue any such hearings from time to time as the chancellor may do. Said reports may be confirmed at any time and place which may have been designated in the order of reference without further notice.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4326; 1930, § 4425; 1942, § 4630; Laws, 1912, ch. 196; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 112, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 51-31-109.
Expenses of chancellor and master taxed against district.

The chancellor or any master appointed by the chancellor shall be entitled to receive and shall tax against the drainage district, as a part of the costs, all expenses incurred by the chancellor or master on account of hearing, considering, and determining any and all matters connected with the organization of such drainage district. In addition to receiving his traveling and other expenses, the master shall receive such additional compensation as shall be allowed him by the chancellor.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4327; 1930, § 4426; 1942, § 4631; Laws, 1912, ch. 196.